North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Part 1. In General.
§ 163-278.22.
Duties of State Board.

It shall be the duty and power of the State Board:

To prescribe forms of statements and other information required to be filed by this Article, to furnish such forms to the county boards of elections and individuals, media or others required to file such statements and information, and to prepare, publish
and distribute or cause to be distributed to all candidates at the time they file notices of candidacy a manual setting forth the provisions of this Article and a prescribed uniform system for accounts required to file statements
by this Article.

To accept and file any information voluntarily supplied that exceeds the requirements of this Article.

To develop a filing, coding, and cross-indexing system consonant with the purposes of this Article.

To make statements and other information filed with it available to the public at a charge not to exceed actual cost of copying.

To preserve reports and statements filed under this Article. Such reports and statements, after a period of two years following the election year, may be transferred to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, Office of Archives and History,
and shall be preserved for a period of 10 years.

To prepare and publish such reports as it may deem appropriate.

To make investigations to the extent the State Board deems necessary with respect to statements filed under the provisions of this Article and with respect to alleged failures to file any statement required under the provisions of this Article or Article
22M of [this Chapter of] the General Statutes and, upon complaint, signed and sworn under oath or affirmation, by any registered voter, with respect to alleged violations of any part of this Article or Article 22M of [this Chapter
of] the General Statutes. All investigations shall be confidential, and no investigation shall be initiated more than four years from the earliest of the following dates:

The facts constituting the violation are known to the State Board or county board with jurisdiction.

The facts constituting the violation can be determined from the public record.

The complainant knew or should have known of the conduct upon which the complaint is based.

(7a)
To request and receive confidential recommendations from the State Ethics Commission regarding the appropriateness of a criminal referral of campaign finance violations.

After investigation and receipt of the confidential recommendations regarding the appropriateness of a criminal referral for campaign finance violations, to report apparent violations by candidates, political committees, referendum committees, legal expense
funds, individuals or persons to the proper district attorney as provided in

G.S. 163-278.27

.

To prescribe and furnish forms of statements and other material to the county boards of elections for distribution to candidates and committees required to be filed with the county boards.

To instruct the chairman and director of elections of each county board as to their respective duties and responsibilities relative to the administration of this Article.

To require appropriate certification of delinquent or late filings from the county boards of elections and to execute the same responsibilities relative to such reports as provided in

G.S. 163-278.27

.

To assist county boards of elections in resolving questions arising from the administration of this Article.

To require county boards of elections to hold such hearings, make such investigations, and make reports to the State Board as the State Board deems necessary in the administration of this Article.

To calculate, assess, and collect civil penalties pursuant to this Article.

To establish a process for determination as to whether communication is an expenditure, independent expenditure, or electioneering communication prior to the airing or distribution of that communication when so requested by an individual or person producing
a communication. The responsibility for the determination may be delegated to the Executive Director. If the responsibility is delegated to the Executive Director, the process established by the State Board shall require a written
determination by the Executive Director to include stated findings and an opportunity for immediate appeal to the State Board of the determination by the Executive Director.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1975, c. 798, s. 8; 1977, c. 626, s. 1; 1979, c. 500, ss. 9, 12, 13; c. 1073, s. 18; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; 1997-515, s. 7(e); 2002-159, s. 35(n); 2007-349, ss. 2, 3; 2010-170, s. 6; 2015- 241, s. 14.30(s);
2016-125, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 5(k); 2017-6, ss. 2, 3, 7(k); 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 4.2(b), 4.11(c).

Preclearance under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act.

Session Laws 2010-170, s. 17, provides, in part: “Sections 1 through 15 of this act become effective upon preclearance by the United States Department of Justice.” Preclearance was received by letter dated September 23, 2010.

§ 163-278.23.
Duties of Executive Director of State Board.

The Executive Director of the State Board shall inspect or cause to be inspected each statement filed with the State Board under this Article within 30 days after the date it is filed. The Executive Director shall advise, or cause to be advised, no more
than 30 days and at least five days before each report is due, each candidate or treasurer whose organizational report has been filed, of the specific date each report is due. He shall immediately notify any individual, candidate,
treasurer, political committee, referendum committee, media, or other entity that may be required to file a statement under this Article if:

It appears that the individual, candidate, treasurer, political committee, referendum committee, media, or other entity has failed to file a statement as required by law or that a statement filed does not conform to this Article; or

A written complaint is filed under oath with the State Board by any registered voter of this State alleging that a statement filed with the State Board does not conform to this Article or to the truth or that an individual, candidate, treasurer, political
committee, referendum committee, media, or other entity has failed to file a statement required by this Article.

The entity that is the subject of the complaint will be given an opportunity to respond to the complaint before any action is taken requiring compliance.

The Executive Director of the Board of Elections shall issue written opinions to candidates, the communications media, political committees, referendum committees, or other entities upon request, regarding filing procedures and compliance with this Article.
Any such opinion so issued shall specifically refer to this paragraph. If the candidate, communications media, political committees, referendum committees, or other entities rely on and comply with the opinion of the Executive
Director of the Board of Elections, then prosecution or civil action on account of the procedure followed pursuant thereto and prosecution for failure to comply with the statute inconsistent with the written ruling of the Executive
Director of the Board of Elections issued to the candidate or committee involved shall be barred. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prohibit or delay the regular and timely filing of reports. The Executive Director
shall file all opinions issued pursuant to this section with the Codifier of Rules to be published unedited in the North Carolina Register and the North Carolina Administrative Code.

This section applies to Articles and [Article] 22M of [this Chapter of] the General Statutes to the same extent that it applies to this Article.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1975, c. 334; c. 565, s. 4; 1979, c. 500, s. 7; c. 1073, ss. 12, 13, 17; 1985, c. 759, s. 6.1; 1999-424, s. 6(c); 1999-453, s. 5(b); 1999-456, s. 63; 2001-319, s. 11; 2005-430, s. 8; 2007-349, s. 6;
2013, s. 21.1; 2013-381, ss. 43.1, 47.1, 48.3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.24.
Statements examined within four months.

Within four months after the date of each election or referendum, the Executive Director shall examine or cause to be examined each statement filed with the Board under this Article, and, referring to the election or referendum, determine whether the
statement conforms to law and to the truth.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1979, c. 500, s. 8; c. 1073, s. 14; 1985, c. 183, s. 3; 2001-319, s. 11; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.25.
Issuance of declaration of nomination or certificate of election.

No declaration of nomination and no certificate of election shall be granted to any candidate until the candidate or his treasurer has filed the statements referring to the election he is required to file under this Article. Within 24 hours after reaching
a decision that a declaration of nomination or certificate of election should not be granted, the Board shall give written notice of that decision, by telegraph or certified mail, to the candidate and the candidate’s treasurer. Failure
to grant certification shall not affect a successful candidate’s title to an office to which he has been otherwise duly elected.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.26.
Appeals from State Board of Elections; early docketing.

Any candidate for nomination or election who is denied a declaration of nomination or certificate of election, pursuant to

G.S. 163-278.25

, may, within five days after the action of the Board under that section, appeal to the Superior Court of Wake County for a final determination of any questions of law or fact which may be involved in the Board’s action.
The cause shall be entitled “In the Matter of the Candidacy of . . . . . . . . .” It shall be placed on the civil docket of that court and shall have precedence over all other civil actions. In the event of an appeal, the chairman
of the Board shall certify the record to the clerk of that court within five days after the appeal is noted.

The record on appeal shall consist of all reports filed by the candidate or his treasurer with the Board pursuant to this Article, and a memorandum of the Board setting forth with particularity the reasons for its action in denying the candidate a declaration
of nomination or certificate of election. Written notice of the appeal shall be given to the Board by the candidate or his attorney, and may be effected by mail or personal delivery. On appeal, the cause shall be heard de novo.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.27.
Criminal penalties; duty to report and prosecute.

Any individual, candidate, political committee, referendum committee, treasurer, person or media who intentionally violates the applicable provisions of

G.S. 163-278.7

, 163-278.8, 163-278.9, 163-278.10, 163-278.11, 163-278.12, 163-278.13, 163-278.13B, 163-278.14, 163-278.16, 163-278.16B, 163-278.17, 163-278.18, 163-278.19, 163-278.20, 163-278.39, 163-278.40A, 163-278.40B, 163-278.40C,
163-278.40D, 163-278.40E, or 163-278.40J is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. The statute of limitations as stated in

G.S. 15-1

shall run from the day the last report is due to be filed with the appropriate board of elections for the election cycle for which the violation occurred.

A violation of

G.S. 163-278.32

by making a certification knowing the information to be untrue is a Class I felony.

A person or individual who intentionally violates G.S. 163-278.14(a) or G.S. 163-278.19(a) and the unlawful contributions total more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per election is guilty of a Class I felony. (c1) The Board shall refer apparent violations
under this section to the State Ethics Commission. The State Ethics Commission shall investigate and make confidential recommendations to the Board regarding the appropriateness of a criminal referral for those alleged violations,
as provided in

G.S. 138A-13.5

. The Board shall not take action under subsection (b) of this section for 90 days after the referral to the State Ethics Commission.

Following receipt and consideration of the confidential recommendation from the State Ethics Commission as provided in subsection (a3) of this section, if the Board has knowledge of or has reason to believe there has been a violation of any section of
this Article, it shall report that fact, together with accompanying details and a copy of the recommendation issued by the State Ethics Commission, to the following prosecuting authorities:

In the case of a candidate for nomination or election to the State Senate or State House of Representatives: report to the district attorney of the prosecutorial district in which the candidate for nomination or election resides;

In the case of a candidate for nomination or election to the office of Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, State Auditor, State Treasurer, State Superintendent of Public Instruction, State Attorney General, State Commissioner of Agriculture,
State Commissioner of Labor, State Commissioner of Insurance, and all other State elective offices, Justice of the Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, judge of a superior court, judge of a district court, and
district attorney of the superior court: report to the district attorney of the prosecutorial district in which Wake County is located;

In the case of an individual other than a candidate, including, without limitation, violations by members of political committees, referendum committees or treasurers: report to the district attorney of the prosecutorial district in which the individual
resides; and

In the case of a person or any group of individuals: report to the district attorney or district attorneys of the prosecutorial district or districts in which any of the officers, directors, agents, employees or members of the person or group reside.

Upon receipt of such a report from the Board, the appropriate district attorney shall prosecute the individual or persons alleged to have violated a section or sections of this Article.

As a condition of probation, a sentencing judge may order that the costs incurred by the State Board of Elections in investigating and aiding the prosecution of a case be paid to the State Board of Elections by the defendant on such terms and conditions
as set by the judge.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1979, c. 500, s. 10; c. 1073, ss. 15, 19; 1981, c. 837, s. 4; 1987, c. 565, s. 17; 1993, c. 539, s. 1118; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1999-453, s. 2(c); 2001-419, s. 2; 2006-161, s. 5; 2007-391,
s. 1(b); 2008-150, s. 9(b); 2008-187, s. 29; 2010-169, s. 6(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 4.11(d).

§ 163-278.28.
Issuance of injunctions; special prosecutors named.

The superior courts of this State shall have jurisdiction to issue injunctions or grant any other equitable relief appropriate to enforce the provisions of this Article upon application by any registered voter of the State.

If the Board makes a report to a district attorney under

G.S. 163-278.27

and no prosecution is initiated within 45 days after the report is made, any registered voter of the prosecutorial district to whose district attorney a report has been made, or any board of elections in that district,
may, by verified affidavit, petition the superior court for that district for the appointment of a special prosecutor to prosecute the individuals or persons who have or who are believed to have violated any section of this Article.
Upon receipt of a petition for the appointment of a special prosecutor, the superior court shall issue an order to show cause, directed at the individuals or persons alleged in the petition to be in violation of this Article, why
a special prosecutor should not be appointed. If there is no answer to the order, the court shall appoint a special prosecutor. If there is an answer, the court shall hold a hearing on the order, at which both the petitioning and
answering parties may be heard, to determine whether a prima facie case of a violation and failure to prosecute exists. If there is such a prima facie case, the court shall so find and shall thereupon appoint a special prosecutor
to prosecute the alleged violators. The special prosecutor shall take the oath required of assistant district attorneys by

G.S. 7A-63

, shall serve as an assistant district attorney pro tem of the appropriate district, and shall prosecute the alleged violators.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1979, c. 500, s. 11; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.29.
Compelling self-incriminating testimony; individual so testifying excused from prosecution.

No individual shall be excused from attending or testifying or producing any books, papers, or other documents before any court upon any proceeding or trial of another for the violation of any of the provisions of this Article, upon the ground or for
the reason that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of him may tend to incriminate him, but such individual may be subpoenaed and required to testify by and for the State relative to any offense arising under
the provisions of this Article; but such individual shall not be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter or thing concerning which he may be compelled to testify or produce
evidence, documentary or otherwise, and no compelled testimony so given or produced shall be used against him upon any criminal proceeding, but such individual so compelled to testify with respect to any acts of his own shall be immune
from prosecution on account thereof.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.30.
Candidates for federal offices to file information reports.

Candidates for nomination in a party primary or for election in a general or special election to the offices of United States Senator, member of the United States House of Representatives, President or Vice-President of the United States shall file with
the Board all reports they or political committee treasurers or other agents acting for them are required to file under the Federal Election Campaign Act of 1971, P.L. 92-225, as amended (T. 2, U.S.C. section 439). Those reports shall
be filed with the Board at the times required by that act. The Board shall, with respect to those reports, have the following duties only:

To receive and maintain in an orderly manner all reports and statements required to be filed with it;

To preserve reports and statements filed under the Federal Election Campaign Act. Such reports and statements, after a period of two years following the election year, may be transferred to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, Division of
Archives and History, and shall be preserved for a period of 10 years or for such period as may be required by federal law;

To make the reports and statements filed with it available for public inspection and copying during regular office hours, commencing as soon as practicable but not later than the end of the day during which they were received, and to permit copying of
any such report or statement by hand or by duplicating machine, requested by any individual, at the expense of such individual; and

To compile and maintain a current list of all statements or parts of statements pertaining to each candidate.

Any duty of a candidate to file and the State Board to receive and make available under this section may be met by an agreement between the State Board and the Federal Election Commission, the effect of which is for the Federal Election Commission to
provide promptly to the State Board the information required by this section.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1979, c. 500, s. 14; 2002-159, s. 55(l); 2015-241, s. 14.30(s); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.31.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 183, s. 4.

§ 163-278.32.
Statements under oath.

Any statement required to be filed under this Article shall be signed and certified as true and correct by the individual, media, candidate, treasurer or others required to file it, and shall be certified as true and correct to the best of the knowledge
of the individual, media, candidate, treasurer or others filing the statement; provided further that the candidate shall certify as true and correct to the best of his knowledge the organizational report and appointment of treasurer
filed for the candidate or the candidate’s principal campaign committee. A certification under this Article shall be treated as under oath, and any person making a certification under this Article knowing the information to be untrue
is guilty of a Class I felony.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1999-426, s. 10(a); 2001-235, s. 1; 2007-391, s. 1(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.33.
Applicability of Article 22.

Sections 163-271 through 163-278 shall be applicable to the offices covered by this Article and

G.S. 163-271

through 163-278 shall be applicable to all elective offices not covered by this Article.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 3; 1975, c. 50; c. 565, s. 10; 2002-159, s. 21(f); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.34.
Civil penalties.

Civil Penalties for Late Filing. — Except as provided in

G.S. 163-278.9

and

G.S. 163-278.9

A, all reports, statements or other documents required by this Article to be filed with the Board shall be filed either by manual delivery to or by mail addressed to the Board. Timely filing shall be complete if
postmarked on the day the reports, statements or other documents are to be delivered to the Board. If a report, statement or other document is not filed within the time required by this Article, then the individual, person, media,
candidate, political committee, referendum committee or treasurer responsible for filing shall pay to the State Board of Elections election enforcement costs and a civil late penalty as follows:

Two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) per day for each day the filing is late for a report that affects statewide elections, not to exceed a total of ten thousand dollars ($10,000); and

Fifty dollars ($50.00) per day for each day the filing is late for a report that affects only nonstatewide elections, not to exceed a total of five hundred dollars ($500.00).If the form is filed by mail, no civil late penalty shall be assessed for any
day after the date of postmark. No civil late penalty shall be assessed for any day when the Board office at which the report is due is closed. The State Board shall immediately notify, or cause to be notified, late filers,
from which reports are apparently due, by mail, of the penalties under this section. The State Board of Elections may waive a late penalty if it determines there is good cause for the waiver.If the Board determines by clear
and convincing evidence that the late filing constitutes a willful attempt to conceal contributions or expenditures, the Board may assess a civil penalty in an amount to be determined by that Board, plus the costs of investigation,
assessment, and collection. The civil penalty shall not exceed three times the amount of the contributions and expenditures willfully attempted to be concealed.

Civil Penalties for Illegal Contributions and Expenditures. — If an individual, person, political committee, referendum committee, candidate, or other entity intentionally makes or accepts a contribution or makes an unlawful expenditure in violation
of this Article, then that entity shall pay to the State Board of Elections, in an amount to be determined by that Board, a civil penalty and the costs of investigation, assessment, and collection. The civil penalty shall not exceed
three times the amount of the unlawful contribution or expenditure involved in the violation. The State Board of Elections may, in addition to the civil penalty, order that the amount unlawfully received be paid to the State Board
by check, and any money so received by the State Board shall be deposited in the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund of North Carolina.

Civil Remedies Other Than Penalties. — The State Board of Elections, in lieu of or in addition to imposing a civil penalty under subsection (a) or (b) of this section, may take one or more of the following actions with respect to a violation for which
a civil penalty could be imposed:

Issue an order requiring the violator to cease and desist from the violation found.

Issue an order to cease receiving contributions and making expenditures until a delinquent report has been filed and any civil penalty satisfied.

Issue an order requiring the violator to take any remedial action deemed appropriate by the Board.

Issue an order requiring the violator to file any report, statement, or other information as required by this Article or the rules adopted by the Board.

Publicly reprimand the violator for the violation.

Facts in Mitigation. — An individual or other entity notified that a penalty has been assessed against it may submit an affidavit to the State Board of Elections stating the facts in mitigation. The State Board of Elections may waive a civil penalty
in whole or in part if it determines there is good cause for the waiver.

Calculation and Assessment. — The State Board shall calculate and assess the amount of the civil penalty due under subsection (a) or (b) of this section and shall notify the person who is assessed the civil penalty of the amount. The notice of assessment
shall be served by any means authorized under

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4, and shall direct the violator either to pay the assessment or to contest the assessment within 30 days by filing a petition for a contested case under Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.
If a violator does not pay a civil penalty assessed by the Board within 30 days after it is due, the Board shall request the Attorney General to institute a civil action to recover the amount of the assessment. The civil action
may be brought in the superior court of any county where the report was due to be filed or any county where the violator resides or maintains an office. A civil action must be filed within three years of the date the assessment
was due. An assessment that is not contested is due when the violator is served with a notice of assessment. An assessment that is contested is due at the conclusion of the administrative and judicial review of the assessment.
The State Board of Elections shall pay the clear proceeds of civil penalties collected under this section to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund pursuant to

G.S. 115C-457.2

. The State Board of Elections shall reduce the monies collected by the enforcement costs and the collection costs to determine the clear proceeds payable to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund. Monies set aside
for the costs of enforcement and the costs of collection shall be credited to accounts of the State Board of Elections.

OAH Review. — After assessing a civil penalty under subsection (b) of this section or imposing a civil remedy under subsection (c) of this section, appeal of the decision of the State Board of Elections under this section shall be in accordance with
Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1975, c. 565, s. 5; 1979, c. 1073, s. 19; 1997-515, s. 7(a); 2001-353, s. 10; 2001-419, s. 1; 2007-391, ss. 2(a), 37; 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a) (b); 2018-146, s. 4.4.

§ 163-278.34A.
Presumptions.

In any proceeding brought pursuant to this Article in which a presumption arises from the proof of certain facts, the defendant may offer some evidence to rebut the presumption, but the State bears the ultimate burden of proving the essential elements
of its case.

History.
1999-31, s. 1(c); 1999-453, s. 3.1(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.35.
Preservation of records.

All reports, records and accounts required by this Article to be made, kept, filed, or maintained by any individual, media, candidate or treasurer shall be preserved and retained by the individual, media, candidate or treasurer for at least two years
counting from the date of the election to which such reports, records and accounts refer.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.36.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-349, s. 4, effective January 1, 2008.

§ 163-278.37.
County boards of elections to preserve reports.

The county boards of elections shall preserve all reports and statements filed with them pursuant to this Article for such period of time as directed by the State Board.

History.
1979, c. 500, s. 15; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.38.
Effect of failure to comply.

The failure to comply with the provisions of this Article shall not invalidate the results of any referendum.

History.
1979, c. 1073, s. 11; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§§ 163-278.38A through 163-278.38Y.

Reserved for future codification purposes.